Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.200

Hours of darkness.

"Hours of darkness" means the hours from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise, and any other time when persons or objects may not be clearly discernible at a distance of five hundred feet.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.200. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 21; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]